Massachusetts, session 194th, S271.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 59 of chapter 140 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014 Official Edition,
is hereby amended, at the end thereof, by inserting the following new paragraph:
A person, within ten days of such action, may appeal to the registrar the action of a
licensing board or officer to approve and grant a class 1 license to a party pursuant to section 58
and this section. For the purposes of this section, a class 1 licensee, licensed under subsection (b)
of Section 58, shall be deemed to have standing to challenge, administratively and judicially, the
issuance of a class 1 license to another person by a licensing board or officer under this chapter if
said class 1 licensee, asserting a challenge, alleges that said licensing board or officer has
approved a class 1 license to a party that has not satisfied the requirements of said subsection (b)
of section 58. The registrar shall adopt rules and regulations providing for a process in which a
of 2

person, including, but not limited to, a class 1 licensee, licensed under subsection (b) of section
58, may challenge the decision of a licensing board or officer pursuant to this section. The
registrar shall render a decision either to affirm or revoke the license in dispute within thirty days
of receipt of the challenge. A person who is aggrieved by the decision of the registrar to re-affirm
or revoke the approval of the class 1 license so challenged pursuant to the process herein may,
within ten days after such action by the registrar, appeal therefrom to any justice of the superior
court in the county in which the premises sought to be occupied under the license or permit
applied for are located. The justice shall, after such notice to the parties as he deems reasonable,
give a summary hearing on such appeal, and shall have jurisdiction in equity to review all
questions of fact or law and may affirm or reverse the decision of the board or officer and may
make any appropriate decree.
of 2